Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.16
Forms; notarized; filing.

The forms provided by sections 43-146.06 and 43-146.08 shall be notarized and filed with the department which shall keep such forms with all other records of the adopted person.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 21;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 57;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 105.